Tables/Contraction/de-2015.ctb
sufword bein 12-1246 shouldn't use the bei-contraction
prfword bein 12-1246 shouldn't use the bei-contraction
prfword beine 12-1246-15 shouldn't use the bei-contraction
prfword beines 12-1246-123456 shouldn't use the bei-contraction
prfword beins 12-1246-234 shouldn't use the bei-contraction
always beinchen 12-1246-1456-14
always beindex 23-35-145-15-6-1346
always beinheit 12-1246-125
always beinricht 12-1246-2-3456
always beinsetz 12-1246-2-15
always beinstell 12-1246-2-13456
always beinteil 12-1246-2345-146-123
always beinterview 23-35-2345-12456-1236-24-15-2456

always einbein 1246-12-1246 shouldn't use the bei-contraction
always zweibein 1356-2456-146-12-1246 shouldn't use the bei-contraction
always dreibein 145-1235-146-12-1246 shouldn't use the bei-contraction
always vierbein 1236-346-1235-12-1246 shouldn't use the bei-contraction
always fünfbein 124-1256-1345-124-12-1246
always sechsbein 234-15-1456-234-12-1246
always achtbein 1-1456-2345-12-1246 shouldn't use the bei-contraction
always bauchbein 12-16-1456-12-1246 shouldn't use the bei-contraction
always beidbein 12-145-12-1246
always breitbein 12-1235-146-2345-12-1246
always brustbein 12-1235-136-23456-12-1246 shouldn't use the bei-contraction
always dackelbein 145-1-46-13456-12-1246
always drachenbein 145-1235-56-14-12-1246
always drahtbein 145-1235-1-125-2345-12-1246 shouldn't use the bei-contraction
always drehbein 145-1235-2356-12-1246
always dünnbein 145-1256-1345-1345-12-1246
always eisbein 146-234-12-1246
before st begword eis 146-234
always elfenbein 13456-124-14-12-1246 shouldn't use the bei-contraction
always telfenbein 2345-13456-124-14-12-1246 shouldn't use the bei-contraction
always federbein 124-15-145-12456-12-1246
always felsenbein 124-13456-234-14-12-1246
always fersenbein 124-12456-234-14-12-1246
always fischbein 124-24-156-12-1246
always fliegenbein 124-123-346-1245-14-12-1246
always gaumenbein 1245-16-134-14-12-1246
always grätschbein 1245-1235-345-2345-156-12-1246
always hinterbein 125-35-2345-12456-12-1246
always hirnbein 125-24-1235-1345-12-1246
always hochbein 125-135-1456-12-1246
always holzbein 125-135-123-1356-12-1246
always hufbein 125-136-124-12-1246
always hüftbein 125-1256-124-2345-12-1246
always hühnerbein 125-1256-125-1345-12456-12-1246
always jochbein 245-135-1456-12-1246
always keilbein 13-146-123-12-1246
always kreuzbein 13-1235-126-1356-12-1246
always krummbein 13-1235-136-1346-12-1246
always kurzbein 13-1356-12-1246 shouldn't use the bei-contraction
always langbein 123-1245-12-1246
always laufbein 123-16-124-12-1246
always mittelbein 134-2345-12-1246
always nasenbein 1345-1-234-14-12-1246
always raucherbein 1235-16-1456-12456-12-1246
always rinderbein 1235-35-145-12456-12-1246
always schambein 156-1-134-12-1246
always schienbein 156-346-1345-12-1246
always sitzbein 2-24-12-1246
always spielbein 2-346-12-1246
always spinnenbein 234-1234-35-1345-14-12-1246
always spreizbein 234-1234-1235-146-1356-12-1246
always sprungbein 234-1234-1235-256-1245-12-1246
always standbein 2-23456-12-1246
always steifbein 23456-146-124-12-1246
always steißbein 23456-146-6-2346-12-1246
always stirnbein 23456-24-1235-1345-12-1246
always stuhlbein 23456-136-125-123-12-1246
always tischbein 2345-24-156-12-1246
always überbein 2-1256-12-1246
always vielbein 1236-123-12-1246
always vorderbein 2-26-145-12456-12-1246
always wadenbein 2456-1-145-14-12-1246
always zahnbein 1356-1-125-1345-12-1246
always zungenbein 1356-256-1245-14-12-1246

always beizung 12-146-1356-136 shouldn't use the bei-contraction
always beiß 12-146-6-2346 shouldn't use the bei-contraction
prfword beil 12-146-123
prfword beile 12-146-123-15
prfword beilen 12-146-123-14
prfword beils 12-146-123-234
endword bein 12-1246 shouldn't use the bei-contraction
endword beine 12-1246-15 shouldn't use the bei-contraction
endword beinen 12-1246-14 shouldn't use the bei-contraction
endword beinend 12-1246-14-145 shouldn't use the bei-contraction
endword beinende 12-1246-14-145-15 shouldn't use the bei-contraction
endword beinendem 12-1246-14-145-12356 shouldn't use the bei-contraction
endword beinenden 12-1246-14-145-14 shouldn't use the bei-contraction
endword beinender 12-1246-14-145-12456 shouldn't use the bei-contraction
endword beinendes 12-1246-14-145-123456 shouldn't use the bei-contraction
endword beines 12-1246-123456 shouldn't use the bei-contraction
endword beinig 12-1246-45
endword beinige 12-1246-45-15
endword beinigem 12-1246-45-12356
endword beinigen 12-1246-45-14
endword beiniger 12-1246-45-12456
endword beiniges 12-1246-45-123456
always beinbruch 12-1246-12-1235-136-1456
always beindruck 12-1246-145-46
always beindustr 23-35-145-136-23456-1235
always beinitiativ 23-35-24-2345-24-5-1236
always beinsel 23-35-234-13456
always beinpaar 12-1246-1234-1-1-1235
before t always beinsegmen 12-1246-234-15-1245-134-14
always beinterfac 23-35-2345-12456-124-1-6-14
always beintrag 12-1246-2345-1245
always beinträg 12-1246-5-2345-1245
always beinwirkung 12-1246-2456-13-136
endword beins 12-1246-234 shouldn't use the bei-contraction
endword beinst 12-1246-23456 shouldn't use the bei-contraction
endword beint 12-1246-2345 shouldn't use the bei-contraction
endword beinte 12-1246-236 shouldn't use the bei-contraction
endword beintem 12-1246-2345-12356
endword beinten 12-1246-2345-14 shouldn't use the bei-contraction
endword beinter 12-1246-2345-12456
endword beintes 12-1246-2345-123456
endword beintest 12-1246-236-23456 shouldn't use the bei-contraction
before t always beinhal 23-35-125-25 shouldn't use the bei-contraction
always beinhalter 12-1246-125-25-2345-12456 should use the ei-contraction
sufword beirr 23-24-1235-1235
always darmbein 145-356-134-12-1246
always gabeinvent 1245-1-23-35-1236-14-2345 Übergabeinventar shouldn't use the bei-contraction
before t always gebeiz 12346-12-146-1356
always kahnbein 13-1-125-1345-12-1246
always kalkbein 13-1-123-13-12-1246
always kreuzbein 13-1235-126-1356-12-1246
always schienbein 156-346-1345-12-1246
always schlüsselbein 156-123-1256-2346-13456-12-1246 shouldn't use the bei-contraction
always sesambein 234-123456-1-134-12-1246
always sitzbein 2-24-12-1246 shouldn't use the bei-contraction
always reibeisen 1235-146-12-146-234-14
before a always beinform 23-35-124-26-134
always beinfrast 23-35-124-1235-1-23456
before t always beinspek 23-35-234-1234-15-13
before t always beinstitu 23-35-23456-24-2345-136
before t always beinstrumen 23-35-23456-1235-136-134-14
always beinstanz 23-35-23456-235-1356

word dem 12356
always dem 2-12356
endword dem 145-12356 shouldn't use the dem-contraction
always sendemast 234-14-145-15-134-1-23456
always außerdem 16-6-2346-12456-2-12356
word indem 35-2-12356
word seitdem 234-146-2345-2-12356
word trotzdem 2345-1356-2-12356
word zudem 2-1356-2-12356
always demask = demaskiert shouldn't use the dem-contraction
always dembleme 145-12356-12-123-12356-15
always dempfänger 145-12356-1234-124-345-1345-1245-12456
always dempfindlich 145-12356-1234-124-35-145-456
always demilit = shouldn't use the dem-contraction
always demonstr 145-12356-135-1345-23456-1235 shouldn't use the dem-contraction
sufword demo 145-12356-135 shouldn't use the dem-contraction
prfword demo 145-12356-135
prfword demos 145-12356-135-234
always epidem 15-1234-24-145-12356
always feldemission 124-13456-145-12356-24-2346-24-135-1345
always ödem 246-145-12356
always remmidemmi 1235-15-1346-24-145-15-1346-24
always sendemast 234-14-145-15-134-1-23456


word durch 1456
always durch 2-1456
sufword durchzuck 2-1456-1356-136-46 shouldn't use the zu-contraction
word durchzug 2-1456-1356-136-1245 shouldn't use the zu-contraction
word durchzuges 2-1456-1356-136-1245-123456 shouldn't use the zu-contraction
sufword durchzugs 2-1456-1356-136-1245-234 shouldn't use the zu-contraction
#begword durcheinandergerat 1456-2-1246-12346-1235-1-2345
always zugerat 2-1356-12346-1235-1-2345 shouldn't use the er-contraction

word für 124
always für 2-124
always fürst 124-1256-1235-23456 shouldn't use the für-contraction

word gegen 1245
always gegen 2-1245
always gegenauigkeit 12346-12346-1345-16-45-13
prfword gegend 12346-1245-14-145
prfword gegenden 12346-1245-14-145-14
prfword gegenzug 2-1245-1356-136-1245
prfword gegenzuge 2-1245-1356-136-12346
prfword gegenzuges 2-1245-1356-136-1245-123456
prfword gegenzugs 2-1245-1356-136-1245-234
before g sufword gegenzun 2-1245-1356-256

word gewesen 12346
always gewesen 2-12346
always fürsorgewesen 2-124-234-26-12346-2456-123456-14 shouldn't use the gewesen-contraction

word immer 1346
always immer 2-1346
always abstimm 1-12-23456-24-1346
always immersion 24-1346-12456-234-24-135-1345 shouldn't use the immer-contraction
always immersiv 24-1346-12456-234-24-1236
always flimmer 124-123-24-1346-12456
always glimmer 1245-123-24-1346-12456
always schimmer 156-24-1346-12456
always schlimmer 156-123-24-1346-12456
sufword simmer 234-24-1346-12456
always trimmer 2345-1235-24-1346-12456
always wimmer 2456-24-1346-12456 shouldn't use the immer-contraction
always zimmer 1356-24-1346-12456 shouldn't use the immer-contraction

word jetzt 245
always jetzt 2-245

word mehr 2356
always mehr 2-2356

word mit 2345
always mit 2-2345
always dynamit =
always mittl =
always mittwoch 134-24-2345-2345-2456-135-1456
always primitiv =
before t always imita =
always imitation 24-134-24-2345-5-1345
always imitativ 24-134-24-2345-5-1236
before g always mitta 134-24-2345-2345-1
always mittägig 134-24-2345-2345-345-1245-45
always mittäglich 134-24-2345-2345-345-1245-456
word termite 2345-12456-134-24-126
always termiten 2345-12456-134-24-2345-14



word nicht 1345
word n 6-1345
always nicht 2-1345
always nichtzughör 2-1345-1356-136-1245-125-246-1235
always nichtzuck 2-1345-1356-136-46
